Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.050

Appeal from adverse decision.

From the director's refusal to issue a certificate of authorization, the applicants or a majority of them, may within thirty days from the date of the filing of the certificate of refusal with the secretary of state, appeal to a board of appeal composed of the governor or the governor's designee, the attorney general and the director by filing in the office of the director a notice that they appeal to such board from his or her refusal. The procedure upon the appeal shall be such as the board may prescribe, and its determination shall be certified, filed, and recorded in the same manner as the director's, and shall be final.

[ 1994 c 92 s 311; 1979 ex.s. c 57 s 6; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.050. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 4, part; RRS s 3316, part.]